de: Radkonstruktionstyp: Beadlock (simuliert); Beadlock (echt); Gegossen (Schwerkraftguss); Gegossen (Niederdruckguss); Flow-Forming; Geschmiedet (Monoblock); Geschmiedet (Mehrteilig); Gerolltes Felgenhorn; Gepresster Stahl; Andere
lt-LT: Ratų konstrukcijos tipas: Su „Beadlock“ imitacija; Tikras „Beadlock“; Lietas (gravitacinis liejimas); Lietas (žemo slėgio); Valcuotas („Flow formed“); Kaltinis monoblokas; Kaltinis, kelių dalių; Valcuotu ratlankiu; Štampuotas plieninis; Kita
sl-SI: Vrsta izdelave kolesa: Beadlock (simuliran); Beadlock (pravi); Lito (gravitacijsko); Lito (nizkotlačno); Flow formed; Kovani monoblok; Kovano večdelno; Valjan rob; Stisnjeno jeklo; Drugo
ja: ホイール構造タイプ: ビードロック (ダミー); ビードロック (リアル); 鋳造 (重力); 低圧鋳造; フローフォーミング; 鍛造モノブロック; 鍛造マルチピース; ロールドリム; スチールプレス; その他
da: Konstruktionstype for hjul: Beadlock (simuleret); Beadlock (ægte); Støbt (tyngdekraft); Støbt (lavtryk); Flow-formet; Smedet monoblok; Smedet flerdelt; Rullet fælg; Udstanset stål; Andet
pt-PT: Tipo de construção da roda: Beadlock (simulado); Beadlock (verdadeiro); Fundição (gravidade); Fundição (baixa pressão); Flow forming; Monobloco forjado; Forjado de várias peças; Jante laminada; Aço estampado; Outro
it: Tipo di costruzione della ruota: Beadlock (simulato); Beadlock (vero); Fuso (per gravità); Fuso (a bassa pressione); Flow formed; Forgiato monoblocco; Forgiato in più pezzi; Cerchio laminato; Acciaio stampato; Altro
zh-CN: 轮圈结构类型: 防脱圈（模拟）; 防脱圈（真实）; 铸造（重力）; 铸造（低压）; 旋压成型; 单片锻造; 多片锻造; 滚压轮辋; 冲压钢; 其他
el: Τύπος κατασκευής τροχού: Beadlock (προσομοίωση); Beadlock (πραγματικό); Χυτή (βαρύτητας); Χυτή (χαμηλής πίεσης); Flow formed; Σφυρήλατη monoblock; Σφυρήλατη πολλαπλών τμημάτων; Rolled rim; Ατσάλινη πρεσαριστή; Άλλο
th: ประเภทโครงสร้างล้อ: บีดล็อก (จำลอง); บีดล็อก (แท้); หล่อ (แรงโน้มถ่วง); หล่อ (แรงดันต่ำ); โฟลว์ฟอร์ม; ฟอร์จโมโนบล็อก; ฟอร์จแบบหลายชิ้น; ขอบม้วน; เหล็กปั๊มขึ้นรูป; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Tip de construcție a roții: Beadlock (simulat); Beadlock (real); Turnat (gravitațional); Turnat (presiune scăzută); Flow formed; Forjat monobloc; Forjat din mai multe bucăți; Jantă laminată; Oțel ștanțat; Altele
nb: Konstruksjonstype for hjul: Beadlock (simulert); Beadlock (ekte); Støpt (gravitet); Støpt (lavtrykk); Flow-formed; Smidd monoblokk; Smidd flerdelt; Valset kant; Stanset stål; Annet
nl: Type wielconstructie: Beadlock (gesimuleerd); Beadlock (echt); Gegoten (zwaartekracht); Gegoten (lagedruk); Flow-formed; Gesmeed monoblok; Gesmeed meerdelig; Gewalste velg; Gestanst staal; Overig
es: Tipo de construcción de ruedas: Beadlock (simulado); Beadlock (verdadero); Fundición (gravedad); Fundición (baja presión); Conformado por flujo; Monobloque forjado; Multipieza forjada; Llanta laminada; Acero estampado; Otro
en: Wheel construction type: Beadlock (simulated); Beadlock (true); Cast (gravity); Cast (low-pressure); Flow formed; Forged monoblock; Forged multi-piece; Rolled rim; Steel stamped; Other
vi: Kiểu kết cấu bánh xe: Khóa mép lốp (mô phỏng); Khóa mép lốp (thật); Đúc (trọng lực); Đúc (áp suất thấp); Tạo hình dòng chảy; Rèn nguyên khối; Rèn ghép nhiều mảnh; Vành cán; Thép dập; Khác
bg-BG: Тип конструкция на колелото: Бийдлок (имитация); Бийдлок (истински); Лети (гравитационно); Лети (с ниско налягане); С ротационно коване (Flow formed); Кован моноблок; Ковани от няколко части; Щампована джанта (Rolled rim); Щампована стомана; Друго
fr: Type de construction de la roue: Beadlock (simulé); Beadlock (véritable); Moulée (gravité); Moulée (basse pression); Fluotournée; Forgée monobloc; Forgée multipièces; Jante roulée; Acier embouti; Autre
pt-BR: Tipo de estrutura da roda: Beadlock (simulado); Beadlock (verdadeiro); Fundida (gravidade); Fundida (baixa pressão); Flow formed; Forjada em bloco único; Forjada em várias peças; Aro laminado; Aço estampado; Outra
pl: Typ konstrukcji koła: Beadlock (imitacja); Beadlock (właściwy); Odlewane (grawitacyjnie); Odlewane (niskociśnieniowo); Formowane przepływowo; Kute (monoblok); Kute (wieloczęściowe); Z wywiniętym rantem; Stalowe (tłoczone); Inne
hr-HR: Vrsta konstrukcije kotača: Beadlock (simulirano); Beadlock (pravo); Lijevano (gravitacijski); Lijevano (niskotlačno); Flow formed; Kovani monoblok; Kovano višedijelno; Valjani rub; Prešani čelik; Ostalo
sk-SK: Typ konštrukcie kolesa: Beadlock (imitácia); Beadlock (pravé); Odlievané (gravitačne); Odlievané (nízkotlakovo); Flow formed; Kované jednodielne; Kované viacdielne; Valcovaný ráfik; Oceľové lisované; Iné
zh-TW: 車輪結構類型: 仿防脫圈; 實防脫圈; 鑄造 (重力); 鑄造 (低壓); 旋壓成型; 單片式鍛造; 多片式鍛造; 滾邊; 鋼製沖壓; 其他
sv: Konstruktionstyp för hjul: Beadlock (simulerad); Beadlock (äkta); Gjuten (gravitationsgjutning); Gjuten (lågtryck); Flow formed; Smidd (monoblock); Smidd (flerdelad); Valsad fälg; Stansat stål; Övrigt
hu: Kerékkonstrukció típusa: Peremzár (szimulált); Peremzár (valódi); Öntött (gravitációs); Öntött (kisnyomású); Folyatva nyomott; Kovácsolt monoblock; Kovácsolt többrészes; Hengerelt peremű; Sajtolt acél; Egyéb
cs: Typ konstrukce kola: Beadlock (simulovaný); Beadlock (pravý); Lité (gravitačně); Lité (nízkotlakově); Flow formed (tvářené tlakem); Kované monoblokové; Kované vícedílné; Válcovaný ráfek; Ocelové lisované; Jiná
ru: Тип конструкции колеса: Бедлок (имитация); Бедлок (настоящий); Литые (гравитационное литье); Литые (литье под низким давлением); Раскатные (Flow Forming); Кованые моноблочные; Кованые составные; Катаный обод; Стальные штампованные; Другое
tr: Tekerlek yapı türü: Beadlock (simüle edilmiş); Beadlock (gerçek); Döküm (yerçekimi); Döküm (düşük basınçlı); Akışla şekillendirilmiş; Dövme monoblok; Dövme çok parçalı; Haddelenmiş jant; Çelik presleme; Diğer
fi: Renkaan rakennetyyppi: Beadlock (jäljitelmä); Beadlock (aito); Valettu (painovoima); Valettu (matalapaine); Painemuovattu; Taottu yksiosainen (monoblock); Taottu moniosainen; Rullattu vanne; Prässätty teräs; Muu
ko: 휠 구조 유형: 비드록(시뮬레이션); 비드록(리얼); 캐스트(중력); 캐스트(저압); 플로 포밍; 단조 모노블록; 단조 멀티 피스; 롤드 림; 스틸 스탬프; 기타